Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202279-449
Plan of reorganization; two or more districts; indebtedness.

Whenever two or more school districts are involved in a reorganization plan, the old districts shall continue to be responsible for any indebtedness incurred before the reorganization takes place unless a different arrangement is included in the plan voted upon by the people.

Laws 1949, c. 249, § 16, p. 679;

Laws 1959, c. 387, § 3, p. 1341;

R.S.Supp.,1961, § 79-426.16;

Laws 1963, c. 479, § 11, p. 1544;

Laws 1971, LB 292, § 6;

Laws 1990, LB 259, § 15;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-426.17;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 198;

Laws 2005, LB 126, § 29;

Referendum 2006, No. 422;

Laws 2021, LB528, § 26.